Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB260.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9017(e.1)(2) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9017. Refunds.* * *(e.1) Truck refrigeration units.--* * *(2) A person shall be reimbursed the amount of tax paid pursuant to section 9004 on any purchase of undyed diesel fuel which is not more than [75] 100 gallons per purchase and is delivered into a fuel tank which is designed to supply only an internal combustion engine mounted on a registered vehicle used exclusively for truck refrigeration.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819